phon-vh.xfst
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------
! vowel harmony
! ---------------------------------------------------------------------------

define back @"vowel-back.a";
define backrounded  @"vowel-back-rounded.a";
define backunrounded  @"vowel-back-unrounded.a";
define front @"vowel-front.a";
define frontrounded  @"vowel-front-rounded.a";
define frontunrounded  @"vowel-front-unrounded.a";
define vowel  @"vowel.a";
define nonvowel \vowel;

regex  ⟪I⟫ -> ı // backunrounded nonvowel* _
    ,, ⟪I⟫ -> u // backrounded nonvowel* _
    ,, ⟪I⟫ -> ü // frontrounded nonvowel* _
    ,, ⟪I⟫ -> i // frontunrounded nonvowel* _
    ,, ⟪A⟫ -> a // back nonvowel* _
    ,, ⟪A⟫ -> e // front nonvowel* _
;
